Maine, session 132, LD220.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §12004-C, sub-§10 is enacted to read:
10.
Hope and Inclusion Scholarship Board Expenses Only for 20-A MRSA §6997
Public Members
appointed pursuant to
Title 20-A, section 6997,
subsection 2, paragraph
A, subparagraph (7)
104 Sec. 2. 20-A MRSA c. 233 is enacted to read:
CHAPTER 233
HOPE AND INCLUSION SCHOLARSHIP PROGRAM
§6997. Hope and Inclusion Scholarship Program
The Hope and Inclusion Scholarship Program is established to provide hope accounts
for qualifying expenses in accordance with this chapter.
1. Definitions. As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise indicates, the
following terms have the following meanings.
A. "Board" means the Hope and Inclusion Scholarship Board established in subsection
2.
B. "Hope account" means an account established under the program to be used for
qualifying expenses in accordance with this chapter.
C. "Program" means the Hope and Inclusion Scholarship Program established in this
chapter.
D. "Public school" means a school administrative unit or a public charter school
authorized under chapter 112.
E. "Qualified school" means a private school approved for attendance purposes
pursuant to chapter 117.
F. "Qualified student" means a person eligible to enroll in a public school within the
State in accordance with section 5001-A.
G. "Qualifying expense" means an approved expense incurred in direct connection
with attendance at a qualified school or a student's educational experience.
2. Hope and Inclusion Scholarship Board. The Hope and Inclusion Scholarship
Board, as established in Title 5, section 12004-C, subsection 10, is established to administer
the program in accordance with this chapter.
A. The board is composed of the following 9 members:
(1) The Treasurer of State, who serves as the chair of the board;
(2) The State Auditor or the State Auditor's designee;
Page 1 - 132LR0548(01)

(3) The Attorney General;
(4) The Commissioner of Education;
(5) The Chancellor of the University of Maine System;
(6) One of the chairs of the Permanent Commission on the Status of Racial,
Indigenous and Tribal Populations, as established in Title 5, section 12004-J,
subsection 19, selected by the commission; and
(7) Three residents of the State who have children who have not attained 21 years
of age, appointed for 3-year terms by the Governor.
B. The board, with the assistance of the department, shall administer the program in
accordance with this chapter.
C. The board may take all actions necessary to successfully administer the program in
accordance with applicable laws, including, but not limited to, executing contracts,
employing personnel, engaging the services of private consultants, actuaries, auditors,
counsel or managers and adopting rules necessary to administer the program.
3. Establish hope accounts. The board shall establish hope accounts as follows.
A. The board by rule shall establish an application process for a parent of a qualified
student to request the establishment of a hope account. The board:
(1) May establish a hope account for a qualified student only if the qualified
student will be receiving education provided by a qualified school or receiving
home instruction under section 5001-A, subsection 3, paragraph A, subparagraph
(4);
(2) May establish a hope account for a qualified student who will be receiving
education provided by a qualified school but who will receive some education
through a public school as long as the majority of the qualified student's education
is being provided by a qualified school; and
(3) May establish a hope account for a qualified student whose parent has agreed
to use the qualified student's hope account only for qualifying expenses.
B. The board may authorize private financial management entities to manage hope
accounts established under this subsection and may establish reasonable fees for
services that a private financial management entity may charge to a hope account.
4. Renewal, carry-over and closure. The board may annually renew a hope account
and deposit funds into the hope account if the parent of a qualified student for whom a hope
account was established under subsection 3 applies for a renewal and the board finds that
the requirements of this subsection and rules adopted under this chapter have been met.
A. Unspent funds in a hope account that is renewed remain in the hope account and
may be used in accordance with this chapter.
B. To qualify for a renewal of a hope account, the qualified student must:
(1) Be a resident of this State;
(2) Have not attained 21 years of age;
(3) Have not successfully completed a secondary education;
Page 2 - 132LR0548(01)

(4) If enrolled in a qualified school, have met the educational standards and
requirements of that qualified school and be in good standing, as demonstrated by
certification from the qualified school, except that, if the qualified student is in an
individualized education plan, the qualified student must have met minimum
educational standards established by the department by rule either by achieving
specified results on a national norm-referenced achievement test or by certification
by a certified teacher; and
(5) If not enrolled in a qualified school, agree to show academic progress through
a standardized achievement test, an approved national norm-referenced
achievement test or, if eligible, have demonstrated academic progress under
section 5001-A, subsection 3, paragraph A, subparagraph (4), division (b).
C. If a parent of a qualified student for whom a hope account was established does not
apply for a renewal or the board finds that the requirements of this section or rules
adopted under this chapter have not been met, the board shall close the hope account
and transfer all funds in the hope account to the State Controller, who shall transfer
these funds to the unappropriated surplus of the General Fund.
5. Funding and oversight. The board shall oversee hope accounts as follows.
A. Each year, the board shall direct the department to deposit into each active hope
account 90% of the state subsidy, as defined in section 15672, subsection 31-A,
attributable to the qualified student for whom the hope account is established that
would otherwise have been provided to the qualified student's school administrative
unit under chapter 606-B. The department shall also direct that school administrative
unit to deposit into the hope account 90% of the school administrative unit's required
contribution to the school administrative unit's total cost of education attributable to
that qualified student. The department shall calculate these amounts and shall allocate
the state funds to the extent possible in a manner consistent with the schedules
applicable to state subsidy payments pursuant to section 15689-B. New funds may not
be deposited in a hope account after the qualified student graduates from high school.
B. The board may receive for and use to pay the costs of administering this chapter up
to 3% of the state subsidy attributable to the qualified student for whom a hope account
is established.
C. The board shall establish and administer a hope account in a manner that allows the
parent of the qualified student for whom the hope account is established to expend
funds in the account only for the following qualifying expenses, and the parent may
use funds in the hope account only to pay for the following qualifying expenses:
(1) Services provided by a public school, including, but not limited to, individual
classes, extracurricular or after-school activities and programs and summer
educational programs;
(2) Tuition or fees at a qualified school;
(3) Textbooks required by a qualified school;
(4) Basic educational supplies, including, but not limited to, paper, writing
implements and computer hardware and technological devices primarily used for
an educational purpose. For the purposes of this subparagraph, "computer
hardware and technological devices" includes calculators, personal computers,
Page 3 - 132LR0548(01)

415 laptops, tablet devices, microscopes, telescopes and printers and does not include
426 entertainment and other primarily noneducational devices such as televisions,
437 telephones, video game consoles and accessories and home theater and audio
448 equipment;
(5) Tutoring or teaching services provided by an individual or a facility accredited
by a state, regional or national accrediting organization;
(6) Curricula and supplementary materials;
(7) Tuition or fees for a private online learning program;
(8) Fees for a national norm-referenced achievement test, fees for a standardized
achievement test or a test developed by school officials administered through the
qualified student's school administrative unit, an advanced placement examination
or any examination related to college or university admission;
(9) Tuition or fees for a program of study or a curriculum of courses that lead to an
industry-recognized credential that satisfies a workforce need, as determined by
the department by rule;
(10) Tuition, fees and materials for enrollment in dual credit or college-level
courses;
(11) Fees to manage the hope account;
(12) Educational services and therapies, including, but not limited to, occupational,
behavioral, physical, speech-language and audiology therapies;
(13) Uniforms purchased through a qualified school; and
(14) Public transportation services.
D. The board shall review all expenditures from hope accounts to ensure that they are
in accordance with the requirements of this subsection and rules adopted under this
chapter. If at any time the board finds that expenditures from a hope account are not
in accordance with the requirements of this subsection or rules adopted under this
chapter, the board shall notify the parent of the qualified student for whom the hope
account is established and if, after an opportunity for hearing, the department
determines that there was in fact a misuse of the funds, the board shall close the hope
account and transfer all funds in the hope account to the State Controller, who shall
transfer those funds to the unappropriated surplus of the General Fund.
6. Rules. The board shall adopt rules necessary to implement this chapter. Rules
adopted by the board pursuant to this subsection are routine technical rules as defined in
Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2-A.
Sec. 3. 20-A MRSA §15689, sub-§17 is enacted to read:
17. Adjustment for hope accounts. The commissioner shall reduce the state share
of the total allocation to a school administrative unit in any year in which one or more hope
accounts under section 6997 are established for students within that school administrative
unit. The amount of the reduction must equal the total state subsidy that is attributable to
all students in that school administrative unit for whom hope accounts have been
established, as determined by the department pursuant to section 6997.
Page 4 - 132LR0548(01)